Utah statutes.
63J-4a-302.   Access to employees -- Cooperating with investigation or audit.

(1)  The office shall have access to interview the following persons if the inspector general determines that the interview may assist the inspector general in fulfilling the duties described in Section 63J-4a-202:

(a)  a state executive branch official, executive director, director, or employee;

(b)  a local government official or employee;

(c)  a consultant or contractor of a person described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b); or

(d)  a provider or an employee of a provider.

(2)  A person described in Subsection (1) and each supervisor of the person shall fully cooperate with the office by:

(a)  providing the office or the inspector general's designee with access to interview the person;

(b)  completely and truthfully answering questions asked by the office or the inspector general's designee;

(c)  providing the records, described in Subsection 63J-4a-301(1), requested by the office or the inspector general's designee; and

(d)  providing the office or the inspector general's designee with information relating to the office's investigation or audit.

(3)  A person described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b) and each supervisor of the person shall fully cooperate with the office by:

(a)  providing records requested by the office or the inspector general's designee; and

(b)  providing the office or the inspector general's designee with information relating to the office's investigation or audit, including information that is classified as private, controlled, or protected under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

